Massachusetts, session 194th, H1214.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Subsection (a) of section 12 of Chapter 200A of the General Laws is hereby
amended by inserting after the word “chapter” the following sentence:- “The identity of the
persons being examined and the records disclosed to the treasurer in the course of said
examinations shall not be subject to disclosure pursuant to chapter 66 and are not public records
within the meaning of chapter 4.”
SECTION 2: This act becomes effective immediately upon signature of the governor and
applies to any and all taxpayer information on or after this date.
of 1